District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, that this
act may be cited as the “Work-based Learning Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 203b of The Public Education Reform Amendment Act of 2007, effective
June 12, 2007 (D.C. Law 17-9; D.C. Official Code 38-192.02 et seq.), is amended by adding a
new subsection (c) to read as follows:
“(c) Within 12 months after the effective date of the Work-based Learning Amendment
Act of 2025, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall provide a report to the Council which shall:
“(1) Evaluate the District's definition of work-based learning, which clearly
defines the set of activities and experiences that qualify as work-based learning for school credit
for high-school students;
“(2) Create a proposal for providing financial incentives to employers engaging in
work-based learning;

“(3) Create a plan to require all high-school students have at least one work-based
learning program of study or other direct experience as part of city-wide graduation requirements
by 2035; and
“(4) Outline any challenges that exist to coordinating work-based learning
opportunities across government.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.